Maine, session 132, LD1004.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 10 MRSA §31, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 500, §2, is amended
to read:
4. Report. The council shall submit a report to the Governor and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over economic development matters by
February 1, 2026 2027 and annually thereafter regarding the activities of the council during
the preceding calendar year. The report must include recommendations as determined
appropriate by the council to effectuate its purpose under this section. After reviewing the
report under this subsection, the joint standing committee may report out legislation
relating to the report.
PART B
Sec. B-1. PL 2025, c. 508, §2, last ¶ is amended to read:
No later than January 1, 2026 2027, the University of Maine System shall submit a
report to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs and to the Joint
Standing Committee on Judiciary joint standing committees of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over education matters and judiciary matters outlining its plan for
implementation of the rural practice track at the University of Maine School of Law,
including any recommendations for legislative or other action. After reviewing the report,
either committee may report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027.
PART C
Sec. C-1. 25 MRSA §2808-B, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 510, §3, is
amended to read:
1. Publishing of policies and procedures. Except as provided by subsection 4, by
January 1, 2026 2027, a law enforcement agency shall publish and make publicly available
Page 1 - 132LR2041(06)

in clear and understandable language the agency's policies and procedures required under
section 2803-B, including:
A. A summary of each key policy of the agency;
B. A comprehensive list of agency rules and guidelines governing law enforcement
officer conduct, including any updates or revisions; and
C. Contact information for a member of the public to request access to information
under paragraph A or B.
PART D
Sec. D-1. PL 2025, c. 512, §3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of
Cannabis Policy; medical cannabis research grant program rulemaking. On or
before January 9, 2026 8, 2027, the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Office of Cannabis Policy shall provisionally adopt and submit for legislative review rules
necessary to implement the medical cannabis research grant program in accordance with
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 2430, subsection 5. Rules adopted by the
office pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
PART E
Sec. E-1. 32 MRSA §99, sub-§10, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 520, §3, is
amended to read:
B. Submit a report containing the results of the commission's studies, findings and
recommendations to the Governor and to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over public safety matters by January 1, 2026 2027 and
annually thereafter. As resources permit, the report must include, but is not limited to:
(1) An assessment of existing and needed resources and expected resource needs
within the State's emergency medical services system and recommendations for
funding those needs;
(2) An evaluation of existing emergency medical services programs, initiatives
and resources, including recommendations for improvements, new programs and
initiatives and funding options for oversight and administration of the State's
emergency medical services system;
(3) Recommendations regarding effective management of resources within the
State's emergency medical services system, enhancing the collection and
distribution of emergency medical services data, methods to evaluate the State's
emergency medical services system and recruitment and retention of emergency
medical services persons, both paid and volunteer; and
(4) The status of municipal emergency medical services plans adopted and
submitted pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3172 and an analysis of those plans.
After reviewing the report submitted under this paragraph, the committee may report
out legislation relating to the report;
Sec. E-2. PL 2025, c. 520, §5, last ¶ is amended to read:
Page 2 - 132LR2041(06)

On or before December 3, 2025 15, 2026, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall
submit a report describing the findings of its analysis and including recommendations and
any proposed legislation to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public
Safety joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over public safety
matters. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out legislation relating to the
report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. E-3. PL 2025, c. 520, §6 is amended to read:
Sec. 6. Maine Emergency Medical Services structural reorganization
proposal. By December 3, 2025 15, 2026, the Department of Public Safety, Maine
Emergency Medical Services shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal
Justice and Public Safety joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over public safety matters a report, including proposed draft legislation, for the
reorganization of the Emergency Medical Services' Board, established in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-A, subsection 15, consistent with the document
titled "Maine EMS: Two-Year Action Plan" published by Maine Emergency Medical
Services on October 27, 2023. The report must include, but is not limited to, identification
of the necessary statutory changes and funding needs associated with the reorganization of
the Emergency Medical Services' Board and any associated structural and organizational
changes within Maine Emergency Medical Services and within the state and regional
governance system for the emergency medical services program, as outlined in the
document titled "Maine EMS: Two-Year Action Plan." After reviewing the report, the
committee may report out legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session
of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. E-4. PL 2025, c. 520, §7 is amended to read:
Sec. 7. Maine Emergency Medical Services public information campaign;
report. The Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall, as
resources allow, develop and, not later than July 1, 2026 2027, implement a public
information campaign designed to enhance the public's understanding and appreciation of
the delivery of emergency medical services, the design and funding of the emergency
medical services system in the State and the essentiality of the services provided by
emergency medical services entities.
On or before December 3, 2025 15, 2026, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall
submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public Safety joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over public safety matters
regarding its development and anticipated implementation of the public information
campaign required under this section. The report must include, but is not limited to, an
assessment of the resource needs associated with the public information campaign and
identification of any anticipated resource needs not currently available within the existing
budgeted resources of Maine Emergency Medical Services necessary for successful
implementation of the campaign. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out
legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd
Legislature in 2027.
PART F
Sec. F-1. 22 MRSA §8111, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 522, §1, is amended to read:
Page 3 - 132LR2041(06)

§8111. Closure notice requirements for children's residential care facilities
After October 1, 2025 2026, the department shall notify the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters whenever a
children's residential care facility ceases to operate no later than 2 weeks after the facility
has ceased operations. The notification to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over health and human services matters must include information about
the facility, including but not limited to the name of the facility, the services provided, the
number of beds, the number of employees, the stated reasons for closure and a de-identified
summary of the transition and discharge plan for the children who were in the facility at
the time of closure. The notification must also include a description of any actions taken
by the department to prevent the closure.
Sec. F-2. PL 2025, c. 522, §3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Provider engagement and needs assessment. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall convene a stakeholder group of child residential treatment
providers to identify the short-term and long-term staffing and resources needs to ensure
the sustainability of child residential treatment providers. The department shall submit a
report, no later than December 3, 2025 January 15, 2027, to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters with its
findings, a needs assessment and recommendations. The joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters is authorized to
report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd
Legislature in 2027.
Sec. F-3. PL 2025, c. 522, §5, first ¶ is amended to read:
Sec. 5. Children's behavioral health services data and policy report. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and submit a report, no later than
December 3, 2025 January 15, 2027, to the Joint Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health
and human services matters that includes data and policy efforts as follows:
PART G
Sec. G-1. PL 2025, c. 523, §3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026 90 days after
adjournment of the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
PART H
Sec. H-1. 20-A MRSA §6304-A, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 529, §1, is amended to
read:
§6304-A. Policy for access to automated external defibrillators
Beginning in the 2026-2027 2027-2028 school year, a school administrative unit shall
develop and implement a policy that provides access to automated external defibrillators at
all school-sponsored athletic events in which students are participating on school property,
including team practices. The policy must include how a person can access an automated
external defibrillator while attending a school-sponsored athletic event. An automated
external defibrillator acquired by a school administrative unit pursuant to this section must
Page 4 - 132LR2041(06)

be tested and maintained according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.
Appropriate first aid, ambulance, rescue service or other appropriate local emergency
medical service providers must be notified of the location and type of automated external
defibrillator acquired.
PART I
Sec. I-1. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 536, §2, is amended to
read:
6. Tick laboratory lottery game. No later than July 1, 2026 2027, the commission,
in consultation with the University of Maine Cooperative Extension, shall develop and
initiate a tick laboratory instant lottery game designed to raise funds for the University of
Maine Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund established in Title 7,
section 2481. Tickets for the instant lottery game established under this subsection must
be sold for $4 and must be changed by the commission periodically throughout the year.
The commission shall annually provide 20% of the net proceeds of the lottery game
established in accordance with this subsection to the University of Maine Cooperative
Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund and 80% to the General Fund.
Sec. I-2. PL 2025, c. 536, §6 is amended to read:
Sec. 6. Report. By December 15, 2028 2029, the State Liquor and Lottery
Commission shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over lottery matters detailing the status of the tick laboratory instant lottery
game established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 8, section 374, subsection
6, including revenues received by the General Fund and the University of Maine
Cooperative Extension Tick Laboratory Operations Fund established in Title 7, section
2481. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over lottery
matters may report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the
134th Legislature in 2029.
PART J
Sec. J-1. Resolve 2025, c. 119, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. 1. Child assertive community treatment team. Resolved: That, by March
1, 2026 2027, the Department of Health and Human Services shall issue a request for
applications for a grant to establish a pilot program to develop one child assertive
community treatment team to serve the Lewiston or Bangor geographic area. The request
for applications must require the awardee of the grant to use workforce incentives designed
to attract, train and retain child assertive community treatment staff. The department shall
engage in a competitive process to determine the awardee. The term of the contract may
not exceed 2 years.
PART K
Sec. K-1. Resolve 2025, c. 121, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. 1. Maine Arts Commission study. Resolved: That the Maine Arts
Commission shall study federal and national efforts to protect artists from copyright
infringement by businesses and others promoting, creating, disseminating or using artificial
intelligence software applications and federal and national efforts to monitor the
Page 5 - 132LR2041(06)

educational use of copyrighted work. The commission shall consult with the Office of the
Attorney General on the subject of the study. In its study, the commission may consider
any relevant work of or obtain information from the Maine State Cultural Affairs Council,
the National Endowment for the Humanities, the National Endowment for the Arts and the
American Society of Composers, Authors and Publishers, as well as any other similar
organizations. The commission may also consider the proposed federal No Fakes Act of
2024, the proposed federal No AI FRAUD Act and Tennessee's Ensuring Likeness, Voice,
and Image Security Act of 2024, as well as other relevant law or case law, including Waits
v. Frito-Lay, Inc., 978 F.2d 1093 (9th Cir. 1992) and Midler v. Ford Motor Co., 849 F.2d
460 (9th Cir. 1988). The commission shall report its findings, including any suggested
legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education and cultural
affairs by December 3, 2025 January 15, 2027. The joint standing committee may report
out a bill to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027 based on
the report.
PART L
Sec. L-1. Resolve 2025, c. 122, §2 is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Report. Resolved: That, by January 15, 2026 2027, the Department of
Education shall submit a report based on the data collected in section 1 to the Joint Standing
Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over education matters. The committee is authorized to submit
legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd
Legislature in 2027.
PART M
Sec. M-1. Resolve 2025, c. 124, §2 is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Report. Resolved: That, by February 15, 2026 2027, the Department of
Education shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural
Affairs joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education
matters based on the review conducted pursuant to section 1. The joint standing committee
may report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
133rd Legislature in 2027.
PART N
Sec. N-1. Resolve 2025, c. 125, §1, last ¶ is amended to read:
The Department of Education shall submit a report based on the results of the survey
to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters no later than
January 15, 2026 2027.
Sec. N-2. Resolve 2025, c. 125, §2, first ¶ is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Working group. Resolved: That, beginning in January 2026 2027, the
Department of Education shall convene a working group of relevant stakeholders to
develop recommendations on increasing accessibility to personal finance education to
students in the State of all grade levels based on the findings of the report developed
Page 6 - 132LR2041(06)

pursuant to section 1. The working group must examine professional development,
curriculum resources, instructional time, staffing and any other supports the working group
considers necessary to expand and strengthen personal finance instruction in school
administrative units. The membership of the working group must include, but is not limited
to:
Sec. N-3. Resolve 2025, c. 125, §2, last ¶ is amended to read:
The Department of Education shall submit a report based on the findings and
recommendations of the working group to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and
Cultural Affairs joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education matters no later than March 1, 2026 2027.
PART O
Sec. O-1. Resolve 2025, c. 126, §1, last ¶ is amended to read:
The department shall distribute the best practices for training in de-escalation and
behavior intervention to all school administrative units in the State no later than September
1, 2026 2027.
PART P
Sec. P-1. Resolve 2025, c. 127, §2 is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Report. Resolved: That the Department of Education shall submit a report
no later than February 1, 2026 2027 to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and
Cultural Affairs joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education matters on the findings of the review described in section 1. The report must
include data regarding the frequency and duration of abbreviated school day placements
and input from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, school personnel and parents.
The report must also include information about the impacts that abbreviated school day
placements may have on school funding and on student outcomes. The Joint Standing
Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs joint standing committee may report out a
bill based on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in
2027.
PART Q
Sec. Q-1. Resolve 2025, c. 128, §4 is amended to read:
Sec. 4. Report. Resolved: That the council shall submit a report, no later than
January 31, 2026 2027, that includes a summary of the findings of the work group along
with recommendations and any suggested legislation to the Joint Standing Committee on
Health and Human Services joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over health and human services matters. The committee shall review the findings and
recommendations of the report and may report out legislation to implement
recommendations related to the report in the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd
Legislature in 2027.
PART R
Sec. R-1. Resolve 2025, c. 130, §1 is amended to read:
Page 7 - 132LR2041(06)

Sec. 1. Department of Corrections to study achieving gender equality.
Resolved: That the Department of Corrections shall study the extent of gender inequality
present in the programs, services, facilities and policies administered or overseen by the
department and shall report its findings to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal
Justice and Public Safety joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over criminal justice and public safety matters by December 3, 2025 January 15, 2027. The
report must include potential solutions for eliminating gender inequality in those areas,
including, but not limited to, the construction or redesignation of current facilities and the
reallocation of resources, programs and opportunities. The joint standing committee may
report out a bill to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027
based on the report.
PART S
Sec. S-1. Resolve 2025, c. 131, §1, first ¶ is amended to read:
Sec. 1. Data related to renewable energy construction projects. Resolved:
That the Governor's Energy Office Department of Energy Resources, referred to in this
resolve as "the office department," shall coordinate with state agencies that permit, regulate
or provide state assistance to renewable energy construction projects, including, but not
limited to, the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Labor, the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry and the Public Utilities
Commission, to evaluate how to display and maintain data regarding renewable energy
construction projects in an efficient, meaningful and publicly accessible manner for the
purposes of identifying renewable energy trends in this State, including through the
development of a database. For the purposes of this resolve, "renewable energy
construction project" or "project" means a source of electrical generation that has a
nameplate capacity of 500 kilowatts or more and relies on a source of generation described
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph C,
subparagraph (2). The evaluation must provide a method to make the data publicly
available and, to the extent practicable, a method for obtaining information from renewable
energy construction project developers, including, but not limited to:
Sec. S-2. Resolve 2025, c. 131, §2, first ¶ is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Evaluation criteria. Resolved: That the office's department's evaluation
required under section 1 must consider:
Sec. S-3. Resolve 2025, c. 131, §2, sub-§7 is amended to read:
7. Whether and through what mechanism the office department may or could be given
the authority to require the provision of timely and accurate information by project
developers or owners;
Sec. S-4. Resolve 2025, c. 131, §2, sub-§8 is amended to read:
8. Whether additional staff or financial resources may be necessary to develop and
maintain the data under section 1 or if it is feasible to maintain this data within existing
resources of the office department; and
Sec. S-5. Resolve 2025, c. 131, §3 is amended to read:
Page 8 - 132LR2041(06)

Sec. 3. Report. Resolved: That the office department, in consultation with the state
agencies listed in section 1, shall submit a report on the evaluation under this resolve to the
Joint Standing Committee on Energy, Utilities and Technology joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy, utilities and technology matters by
February 1, 2026 2027. The report must contain recommendations related to how to display
and maintain data regarding renewable energy construction projects in an efficient,
meaningful and publicly accessible manner for the purposes of identifying renewable
energy trends in this State. The committee may report out a bill to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd 133rd Legislature in 2027 based on the report.
PART T
Sec. T-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: Appropriates funding for a consultant to research and analyze the impact of
unauthorized usage by artificial intelligence on an artist's work as required by Resolve
2025, chapter 121.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $25,000
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $25,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $25,000
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Higher Education and Educator Support Services Z082
Initiative: Appropriates funding to support the working group established by Resolve 2025,
chapter 125 to develop recommendations on increasing accessibility to personal finance
education to students of all grade levels in the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Appropriates funding to contract for staffing services to perform a review of
teacher mentoring programs in public schools and to prepare a report as required by
Resolve 2025, chapter 124.
Page 9 - 132LR2041(06)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $15,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $15,000
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $20,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $20,000
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $45,000
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $45,000
Page 10 - 132LR2041(06)